Utah statutes.
16-10a-1002.   Amendment by board of directors.
(1)  Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation, a
corporation's board of directors may adopt, without shareholder action, one or
more amendments to the corporation's articles of incorporation to:
(a)  delete the names and addresses of incorporators or initial directors or
both from the articles of incorporation;
(b) change the information required by Subsection 16-17-203(1), but an
amendment is not required to change the information;
(c)  change each issued and unissued authorized share of a class into a
greater number of whole shares if the corporation has only shares of that
class outstanding;
(d)  change the corporate name by adding the word "corporation,"
"incorporated," or "company," or an abbreviation of these words, or by
substituting any such word or abbreviation for a similar word or abbreviation
in the name; or
(e)  make any other change expressly permitted by this chapter to be made
without shareholder action.
(2)  The board of directors may adopt, without shareholder action, one or more
amendments to the articles of incorporation to change the corporate name, if
necessary, in connection with the reinstatement of a corporation pursuant to
Section 16-10a-1422.
